Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Article 3. Representation

§ 4-10-301.
Representation; basic effect.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this article has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this article is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation by notifying the trustee or the representative before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

4-10-412

and

4-10-602

, a person who under this article may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor’s behalf.

A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this article with respect to the termination or modification of a trust under W.S. 4-10-412(a).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

in (c) substituted “W.S.

4-10-412

” for “W.S.

4-10-413

”; and added (d)

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

§ 4-10-302.
Representation by holder of general testamentary power of appointment.

The holder of a general testamentary power of appointment may represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-303.
Representation by fiduciaries and parents.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

A conservator may represent and bind the estate that the conservator controls;

A guardian may represent and bind the ward if a conservator of the ward’s estate has not been appointed;

An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

A personal representative of a decedent’s estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate;

A parent with primary legal custody may represent and bind each of the parent’s minor or incapacitated children if no legal representative has been appointed by a court for that child, unborn children of that parent, the unborn descendants of each child, and each minor or incapacitated descendant of each child if no legal representative has been appointed by a court for that descendant, to the extent there is no conflict of interest between the parent and the person or class of persons represented with respect to a particular question or dispute; and

A beneficiary who is not a qualified beneficiary shall be represented and bound by the decisions, actions and omissions of the qualified beneficiary through whom, or by reason of whose death or exercise of a power of appointment, the beneficiary will receive his interest, if any, in the trust, including without limitations for the purposes of W.S.

4-10-802

,

4-10-813

,

4-10-1005

and

4-10-1009

.

A trustee may rely on a certificate of the fiduciary described in paragraphs (a)(i) through (v) of this section with regard to whether or not any such conflict of interest exists.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-304.
Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-305.
Appointment of representative.

If the court determines that an interest is not represented under this article, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a representative to receive notice, give consent and otherwise represent, bind and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

A representative may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this act, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

In making decisions, a representative may consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual’s family.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.